Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20148-162.02
State-chartered
bank; fiduciary account controlled by trust department; collateral; public
funds exempt.

(1) A state-chartered bank may deposit
or have on deposit funds of a fiduciary account controlled by the bank's trust
department unless prohibited by applicable law.

(2) To the extent that the funds are awaiting investment or distribution and are not
insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, a state-chartered
bank shall set aside collateral as security under the control of appropriate
fiduciary officers and bank employees. The bank shall place pledged assets
of fiduciary accounts in the joint custody or control of not fewer than two
of the fiduciary officers or employees of the bank designated for that purpose
by the board of directors. The bank may maintain the investments of a fiduciary
account off-premises if consistent with applicable law and if the bank maintains
adequate safeguards and controls. The market value of the collateral shall
at all times equal or exceed the amount of the uninsured or unguaranteed fiduciary
funds awaiting investment or
distribution.

(3) A state-chartered bank may satisfy the collateral requirements
of this section with any of the following: (a) Direct obligations of the United
States or other obligations fully guaranteed by the United States as to principal
and interest; (b) readily marketable securities of the classes in which banks,
trust companies, or other corporations exercising fiduciary powers are permitted
to invest fiduciary funds under applicable state law; and (c) surety bonds,
to the extent the surety bonds provide adequate security, unless prohibited
by applicable law.

(4) A state-chartered bank, acting in its fiduciary capacity,
may deposit funds of a fiduciary account that are awaiting investment or distribution
with an affiliated insured depository institution unless prohibited by applicable
law. The bank may set aside collateral as security for a deposit by or with
an affiliate of fiduciary funds awaiting investment or distribution, as it
would if the deposit was made at the bank, unless such action is prohibited
by applicable law.

(5) Public funds deposited in and held by a state-chartered
bank are not subject to this section.

(6) This section
does not apply to a fiduciary account in which, pursuant to the terms of the
governing instrument, full investment authority is retained by the grantor
or is vested in persons or entities other than the state-chartered bank and
the bank, acting in its fiduciary capacity, does not have the power to exert
any influence over investment decisions.

Laws 2009, LB327, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB788, § 2.
July 18, 2014